src/kal-lex.txt
+TIP=NNGIT=GALLAR=SSA+vv:%>tinngikkallassa	flex-tv_vaa ;
+TIP=NNGIT=GALUAR+vv:%>tinngikkaluar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=NNGIT=GALUAR+vv:%>tinngikkaluar	Gaq ;
+TIP=NNGIT=NGAJAP=SIMA+vv:%>tinngingajassima	flex-iv_voq ;
+TIP=NNGIT=NGAJAP=SIMA+vv:%>tinngingajassima	Saq ;
+TIP=NNGIT=TUUR+vv:%>tinngitsoor	flex-iv ;
+TIP=NNGIT=TUUR+vv:%>tinngitsoor	Gaq ;
+TIP=QATTAAR+vv:%>teqattaar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=QATTAAR+vv:%>teqattaar	Gaq ;
+TIP=QATTAAR=GALUAR+vv:%>teqattaaraluar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=QATTAAR=GALUAR+vv:%>teqattaaraluar	Gaq ;
+TIP=QATTAAR=GUNAR+vv:%>teqattaarunar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=QATTAAR=GUNAR+vv:%>teqattaarunar	Gaq ;
+TIP=QATTAAR=GUNNAIR+vv:%>teqattaarunnaar	XIiX ;
+TIP=QATTAAR=GUNNAIR+vv:%>teqattaarunnaar	Gaq ;
+TIP=QATTAAR=GUSUP+vv:%>teqattaarusup	flex-iv ;
+TIP=QATTAAR=GUSUP+vv:%>teqattaarusup	Taq ;
+TIP=QATTAAR=INNAR+vv:%>teqattaaginnar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=QATTAAR=INNAR+vv:%>teqattaaginnar	Gaq ;
+TIP=QATTAAR=KATAP+vv:%>teqattaakatap	flex-iv ;
+TIP=QATTAAR=KATAP+vv:%>teqattaakatap	Taq ;
+TIP=QATTAAR=LIR+vv:%>teqattaaler	XIiX ;
+TIP=QATTAAR=LIR+vv:%>teqattaaler	Gaq ;
+TIP=QATTAAR=NIAR+vv:%>teqattaarniar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=QATTAAR=NIAR+vv:%>teqattaarniar	Gaq ;
+TIP=QATTAAR=NIKUU+vv:%>teqattaarnikuu	flex-iv_voq ;
+TIP=QATTAAR=NIKUU+vv:%>teqattaarnikuu	Saq ;
+TIP=QATTAAR=QQAAR+vv:%>teqattaaqqaar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=QATTAAR=QQAAR+vv:%>teqattaaqqaar	Gaq ;
+TIP=QATTAAR=RIAR+vv:%>teqattaariar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=QATTAAR=RIAR+vv:%>teqattaariar	Gaq ;
+TIP=QATTAAR=RIIR+vv:%>teqattaareer	XIiX ;
+TIP=QATTAAR=RIIR+vv:%>teqattaareer	Gaq ;
+TIP=QATTAAR=SIMA+vv:%>teqattaarsima	flex-iv_voq ;
+TIP=QATTAAR=SIMA+vv:%>teqattaarsima	Saq ;
+TIP=QATTAAR=SINNAA+vv:%>teqattaarsinnaa	flex-iv_voq ;
+TIP=QATTAAR=SINNAA+vv:%>teqattaarsinnaa	Saq ;
+TIP=QATTAAR=SSA+vv:%>teqattaassa	flex-iv_ssa ;
+TIP=QATTAAR=SSA+vv:%>teqattaassa	flex-tv_vaa ;
+TIP=QATTAAR=TAR+vv:%>teqattaartar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=QATTAAR=TAR+vv:%>teqattaartar	Gaq ;
+TIP=QATTAAR=TUAR+vv:%>teqattaartuar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=QATTAAR=TUAR+vv:%>teqattaartuar	Gaq ;
+TIP=QATTAAR=TUUR+vv:%>teqattaatoor	flex-iv ;
+TIP=QATTAAR=TUUR+vv:%>teqattaatoor	Gaq ;
+TIP=QQA+vv:%>teqqa	flex-iv_voq ;
+TIP=QQA+vv:%>teqqa	Saq ;
+TIP=QQAAR+vv:%>teqqaar	flex-iv ; 
+TIP=QQAAR+vv:%>teqqaar	Gaq ;
+TIP=QQAAR=NIAR+vv:%>teqqaarniar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=QQAAR=NIAR+vv:%>teqqaarniar	Gaq ;
+TIP=QQAMMIR+vv:%>teqqammer	XIiX ;
+TIP=QQAMMIR+vv:%>teqqammer	Gaq ;
+TIP=QQIP+vv:%>teqqip	XIitX ;
+TIP=QQIP+vv:%>teqqip	Taq ;
+TIP=QQU+vv:%>teqqu	flex-iv_voq ;
+TIP=QQU+vv:%>teqqu	Saq ;
+TIP=RATAR+vv:%>teratar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=RATAR+vv:%>teratar	Gaq ;
+TIP=RATAR=SIMA+vv:%>teratarsima	flex-iv_voq ;
+TIP=RATAR=SIMA+vv:%>teratarsima	Saq ;
+TIP=RATAR=SIMA=NIR+vv:%>teratarsimaner	XIiX_fleksiver ;
+TIP=RATAR=SIMA=NIR+vv:%>teratarsimaner	iGaq_NIR ;
+TIP=RATAR=SIMA=SINNAA+vv:%>teratarsimasinnaa	flex-iv_voq ;
+TIP=RATAR=SIMA=SINNAA+vv:%>teratarsimasinnaa	Saq ;
+TIP=RATAR=SIMA=SINNAA=NIR+vv:%>teratarsimasinnaaner	XIiX_fleksiver ;
+TIP=RATAR=SIMA=SINNAA=NIR+vv:%>teratarsimasinnaaner	iGaq_NIR ;
+TIP=RATAR=SIMA=SINNAA=NNGIT+vv:%>teratarsimasinnaanngi	flex-iv_nngit ;
+TIP=RATAR=SIMA=SINNAA=NNGIT+vv:%>teratarsimasinnaanngi	nngisaq ;
+TIP=RATAR=SIMA=SINNAA=NNGIT=NIR+vv:%>teratarsimasinnaannginner	XIiX_fleksiver ;
+TIP=RATAR=SIMA=SINNAA=NNGIT=NIR+vv:%>teratarsimasinnaannginner	iGaq_NIR ;
+TIP=RIAR+vv:%>teriar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=RIAR+vv:%>teriar	Gaq ;
+TIP=RIIR+vv:%>tereer	flex-iv ;
+TIP=RIIR+vv:%>tereer	Gaq ;
+TIP=RIIR=KATAP+vv:%>teriikatap	flex-iv ;
+TIP=RIIR=KATAP+vv:%>teriikatap	Taq ;
+TIP=RIIR=KATAP=GALUAR+vv:%>teriikatakkaluar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=RIIR=KATAP=GALUAR+vv:%>teriikatakkaluar	Gaq ;
+TIP=RIIR=KATAP=SIMA+vv:%>teriikatassima	flex-iv_voq ;
+TIP=RIIR=KATAP=SIMA+vv:%>teriikatassima	Saq ;
+TIP=RIIR=KATAP=SIMA=GALUAR+vv:%>teriikatassimagaluar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=RIIR=KATAP=SIMA=GALUAR+vv:%>teriikatassimagaluar	Gaq ;
+TIP=RIIR=RUTTUR+vv:%>tereeruttor	flex-iv ;
+TIP=RIIR=RUTTUR+vv:%>tereeruttor	Gaq ;
+TIP=RIIR=SIMA+vv:%>tereersima	Saq ;
+TIP=RIIR=SIMA+vv:%>tereersima	flex-iv_voq ;
+TIP=RIIR=SIMA=GALUAR+vv:%>tereersimagaluar	Gaq ;
+TIP=RIIR=SIMA=GALUAR+vv:%>tereersimagaluar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=RUJUP=SUAR+vv:%>terujussuar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=RUJUP=SUAR+vv:%>terujussuar	Gaq ;
+TIP=RUTTUR+vv:%>teruttor	flex-iv ;
+TIP=RUTTUR+vv:%>teruttor	Gaq ;
+TIP=RUTTUR=SIMA+vv:%>teruttorsima	flex-iv_voq ;
+TIP=RUTTUR=SIMA+vv:%>teruttorsima	Saq ;
+TIP=SIMA+vv:%>tissima	Saq ;
+TIP=SIMA+vv:%>tissima	flex-iv_voq ;
+TIP=SIMA=GUNAR+vv:%>tissimagunar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=SIMA=GUNAR+vv:%>tissimagunar	Gaq ;
+TIP=SIMA=LIR+vv:%>tissimaler	Gaq ;
+TIP=SIMA=LIR+vv:%>tissimaler	XIiX ;
+TIP=SIMA=NIR+vv:%>tissimaner	iGaq_NIR ;
+TIP=SIMA=NIR+vv:%>tissimaner	XIiX_fleksiver ;
+TIP=SIMA=SSA+vv:%>tissimassa	flex-iv_ssa ;
+TIP=SINNAA+vv:%>tissinnaa	flex-iv_voq ;
+TIP=SINNAA+vv:%>tissinnaa	Saq ;
+TIP=SINNAA=GUMA+vv:%>tissinnaajuma	Saq ;
+TIP=SINNAA=GUMA+vv:%>tissinnaajuma	flex-iv_voq ;
+TIP=SINNAA=NAVIAR+vv:%>tissinnaanaviar	Gaq ;
+TIP=SINNAA=NAVIAR+vv:%>tissinnaanaviar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=SINNAA=NAVIAR=NNGIT+vv:%>tissinnaanavianngi	nngisaq ;
+TIP=SINNAA=NAVIAR=NNGIT+vv:%>tissinnaanavianngi	flex-iv_nngit ;
+TIP=SINNAA=NNGIT+vv:%>tissinnaanngi	flex-iv_nngit ;
+TIP=SINNAA=NNGIT+vv:%>tissinnaanngi	nngisaq ;
+TIP=SINNAA=NNGUR+vv:%>tissinnaanngor	flex-iv ;
+TIP=SINNAA=NNGUR+vv:%>tissinnaanngor	flex-tv ;
+TIP=SINNAA=NNGUR=SSA+vv:%>tissinnaanngussa	flex-iv_ssa ;
+TIP=SINNAA=NNGUR=SSA+vv:%>tissinnaanngussa	flex-tv_vaa ;
+TIP=SINNAA=TARIAQAR+vv:%>tissinnaasariaqar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=SINNAA=TARIAQAR+vv:%>tissinnaasariaqar	Gaq ;
+TIP=SSA+vv:%>tissa	flex-iv_voq ;
+TIP=SSA+vv:%>tissa	flex-tv_vaa ;
+TIP=SSA=NGA+vv:%>tissanga	flex-iv_voq ;
+TIP=SSA=NGA+vv:%>tissanga	Saq ;
+TIP=SSA=NGA=NIKUU+vv:%>tissanganikuu	flex-iv_voq ;
+TIP=SSA=NGA=NIKUU+vv:%>tissanganikuu	Saq ;
+TIP=SSA=NGA=NNGIT+vv:%>tissanganngi	flex-iv_nngit ;
+TIP=SSA=NGA=NNGIT+vv:%>tissanganngi	nngisaq ;
+TIP=SSA=NGA=NNGIT=RIAR+vv:%>tissanganngeriar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=SSA=NGA=NNGIT=RIAR+vv:%>tissanganngeriar	Gaq ;
+TIP=SSA=NNGIT+vv:%>tissanngi	flex-iv_nngit ;
+TIP=SSA=NNGIT+vv:%>tissanngi	nngisaq ;
+TIP=SSA=NNGIT=GALUAR+vv:%>tissanngikkaluar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=SSA=NNGIT=GALUAR+vv:%>tissanngikkaluar	Gaq ;
+TIP=SSA=NNGIT=NIR+vv:%>tissannginner	XIiX_fleksiver ;
+TIP=SSA=NNGIT=NIR+vv:%>tissannginner	iGaq_NIR ;
+TIP=TAR+vv:%>tittar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=TAR+vv:%>tittar	Gaq ;
+TIP=TAR=LIR+vv:%>tittaler	XIiX ;
+TIP=TAR=LIR+vv:%>tittaler	Gaq ;
+TIP=TAR=LIR=SSA+vv:%>tittalissa	flex-iv_ssa ;
+TIP=TAR=LIR=SSA+vv:%>tittalissa	flex-tv_vaa ;
+TIP=TAR=SIMA+vv:%>tittarsima	Saq ;
+TIP=TAR=SIMA+vv:%>tittarsima	flex-iv_voq ;
+TIP=TAR=SIMA=SSA+vv:%>tittarsimassa	flex-iv_ssa ;
+TIP=TAR=SIMA=SSA+vv:%>tittarsimassa	flex-tv_vaa ;
+TIP=TAR=SSA+vv:%>tittassa	flex-iv_ssa ;
+TIP=TAR=SSA+vv:%>tittassa	flex-tv_vaa ;
+TIP=TARIAQAR+vv:%>tittariaqar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=TARIAQAR+vv:%>tittariaqar	Gaq ;
+TIP=TSIAR+vv:%>titsiar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=TSIAR+vv:%>titsiar	Gaq ;
+TIP=TUAR+vv:%>tittuar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=TUAR=GALUAR+vv:%>tittuaraluar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=TUAR=GASUAR+vv:%>tittuarasuar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=TUAR=GUMAAR+vv:%>tittuarumaar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=TUAR=GUNAR+vv:%>tittuarunar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=TUAR=GUNNAR+vv:%>tittuarunnar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=TUAR=INNAR+vv:%>tittuaannar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=TUAR=KANNIR+vv:%>tittuakanner	flex-iv ;
+TIP=TUAR=LLAR+vv:%>tittuallar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=TUAR=LLUINNAR+vv:%>tittuarluinnar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=TUAR=MISAAR+vv:%>tittuamisaar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=TUAR=NIKUU+vv:%>tittuarnikuu	flex-iv_voq ;
+TIP=TUAR=NNGUATSIAR+vv:%>tittuannguatsiar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=TUAR=PAJAAR+vv:%>tittuapajaar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=TUAR=PALUP+vv:%>tittuarpalup	flex-iv ;
+TIP=TUAR=PASIP+vv:%>tittuarpasip	XIiX ;
+TIP=TUAR=QQAJAA+vv:%>tittuaqqajaa	flex-iv_voq ;
+TIP=TUAR=SIMA+vv:%>tittuarsima	flex-iv_voq ;
+TIP=TUAR=SINNAA+vv:%>tittuarsinnaa	flex-iv_voq ;
+TIP=TUAR=SINNAR+vv:%>tittuarsinnar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=TUAR=SSA+vv:%>tittuassa	flex-iv_ssa ;
+TIP=TUAR=LIR+vv:%>tittualer	flex-iv ; 
+TIP=TUAR=LIR=GALUAR+vv:%>tittualeraluar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=TUAR=LIR=GASUAR+vv:%>tittualerasuar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=TUAR=LIR=GUMAAR+vv:%>tittualerumaar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=TUAR=LIR=GUNAR+vv:%>tittualerunar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=TUAR=LIR=GUNNAR+vv:%>tittualerunnar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=TUAR=LIR=INNAR+vv:%>tittualiinnar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=TUAR=LIR=KANNIR+vv:%>tittualikanner	flex-iv ;
+TIP=TUAR=LIR=LLAR+vv:%>tittualillar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=TUAR=LIR=LLUINNAR+vv:%>tittualerluinnar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=TUAR=LIR=MISAAR+vv:%>tittualimisaar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=TUAR=LIR=NIKUU+vv:%>tittualernikuu	flex-iv_voq ;
+TIP=TUAR=LIR=NNGUATSIAR+vv:%>tittualinnguatsiar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=TUAR=LIR=PAJAAR+vv:%>tittualipajaar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=TUAR=LIR=PALUP+vv:%>tittualerpalup	flex-iv ;
+TIP=TUAR=LIR=PASIP+vv:%>tittualerpasip	XIiX ;
+TIP=TUAR=LIR=QQAJAA+vv:%>tittualeqqajaa	flex-iv_voq ;
+TIP=TUAR=LIR=SINNAA+vv:%>tittualersinnaa	flex-iv_voq ;
+TIP=TUAR=LIR=SINNAR+vv:%>tittualersinnar	flex-iv ;
+TIP=TUAR=LIR=SSA+vv:%>tittualissa	flex-iv_ssa ;
+TIP=TUAR+vv:%>tittuar	flex-tv ;
+TIP=TUAR=GALUAR+vv:%>tittuaraluar	flex-tv ;
+TIP=TUAR=GASUAR+vv:%>tittuarasuar	flex-tv ;
+TIP=TUAR=GUMAAR+vv:%>tittuarumaar	flex-tv ;
+TIP=TUAR=GUNAR+vv:%>tittuarunar	flex-tv ;
+TIP=TUAR=GUNNAR+vv:%>tittuarunnar	flex-tv ;
+TIP=TUAR=INNAR+vv:%>tittuaannar	flex-tv ;
+TIP=TUAR=KANNIR+vv:%>tittuakanner	flex-tv ;
+TIP=TUAR=LLAR+vv:%>tittuallar	flex-tv ;
+TIP=TUAR=LLUINNAR+vv:%>tittuarluinnar	flex-tv ;
+TIP=TUAR=MISAAR+vv:%>tittuamisaar	flex-tv ;
+TIP=TUAR=NIKUU+vv:%>tittuarnikuu	flex-tv_vaa ;
+TIP=TUAR=NNGUATSIAR+vv:%>tittuannguatsiar	flex-tv ;
+TIP=TUAR=PAJAAR+vv:%>tittuapajaar	flex-tv ;
+TIP=TUAR=PALUP+vv:%>tittuarpalup	flex-tv ;
+TIP=TUAR=PASIP+vv:%>tittuarpasip	flex-tv ;
+TIP=TUAR=QQAJAA+vv:%>tittuaqqajaa	flex-tv_vaa ;
+TIP=TUAR=SIMA+vv:%>tittuarsima	flex-tv_vaa ;
+TIP=TUAR=SINNAA+vv:%>tittuarsinnaa	flex-tv_vaa ;
+TIP=TUAR=SINNAR+vv:%>tittuarsinnar	flex-tv ;
+TIP=TUAR=SSA+vv:%>tittuassa	flex-tv_vaa ;
+TIP=TUAR=LIR+vv:%>tittualer	flex-tv ; 
+TIP=TUAR=LIR=GALUAR+vv:%>tittualeraluar	flex-tv ;
+TIP=TUAR=LIR=GASUAR+vv:%>tittualerasuar	flex-tv ;
+TIP=TUAR=LIR=GUMAAR+vv:%>tittualerumaar	flex-tv ;
+TIP=TUAR=LIR=GUNAR+vv:%>tittualerunar	flex-tv ;
+TIP=TUAR=LIR=GUNNAR+vv:%>tittualerunnar	flex-tv ;
+TIP=TUAR=LIR=INNAR+vv:%>tittualiinnar	flex-tv ;
+TIP=TUAR=LIR=KANNIR+vv:%>tittualikanner	flex-tv ;
+TIP=TUAR=LIR=LLAR+vv:%>tittualillar	flex-tv ;
+TIP=TUAR=LIR=LLUINNAR+vv:%>tittualerluinnar	flex-tv ;
+TIP=TUAR=LIR=MISAAR+vv:%>tittualimisaar	flex-tv ;
+TIP=TUAR=LIR=NIKUU+vv:%>tittualernikuu	flex-tv_vaa ;
+TIP=TUAR=LIR=NNGUATSIAR+vv:%>tittualinnguatsiar	flex-tv ;
+TIP=TUAR=LIR=PAJAAR+vv:%>tittualipajaar	flex-tv ;
+TIP=TUAR=LIR=PALUP+vv:%>tittualerpalup	flex-tv ;
+TIP=TUAR=LIR=PASIP+vv:%>tittualerpasip	flex-tv ;
+TIP=TUAR=LIR=QQAJAA+vv:%>tittualeqqajaa	flex-tv_vaa ;
+TIP=TUAR=LIR=SINNAA+vv:%>tittualersinnaa	flex-tv_vaa ;
+TIP=TUAR=LIR=SINNAR+vv:%>tittualersinnar	flex-tv ;
+TIP=TUAR=LIR=SSA+vv:%>tittualissa	flex-tv_vaa ;
+TIP=UTIGE+vv:%>tiitig	flex-iv_schwa ;
+TIP=UTIGE+vv:%>tiitig	flex-tv_schwa ;
+TIP=VIP+vv:%>tivip	XIiX ;
+TIP=VIP=SINNAA+vv:%>tivissinnaa	flex-tv_vaa ;
+TIR+vv:%>%TRUNCter	flex-iv ;
+TITIR+vv:%>%TRUNCsiter	flex-iv ;
+TSAALI+vv:%>%TRUNCtsaali	Saq ;
+TSAALI=UR+vv:%>%TRUNCtsaalior	Gaq ;
+TSIAR+vv:%>tsiar	flex-iv ;
+TSIAR=GALUAR+vv:%>tsiaraluar	flex-iv ;
+TSIAR=LAAR+vv:%>tsialaar	flex-iv ;
+TSIAR=QQU+vv:%>tsiaqqu	flex-iv_voq ;
+TSIAR=SIMA+vv:%>tsiarsima	flex-iv_voq ;
+TSIAR=SIMA=LIR+vv:%>tsiarsimaler	flex-iv ;
+TSIAR=SINNAA+vv:%>tsiarsinnaa	flex-iv_voq ;
+TSIAR=SINNAA+vv:%>tsiarsinnaa	flex-tv ;
+TUAR+vv:%>tuar	flex-iv ;
+TUAR=GALUAR+vv:%>tuaraluar	flex-iv ;
+TUAR=INNAR+vv:%>tuinnar	flex-iv ;
+TUAR=INNAR+vv:%>tuaannar	flex-iv ;
+TUAR=INNAR=TAR+vv:%>tuaannartar	flex-iv ;
+TUAR=INNAR=GUMAAR+vv:%>tuaannarumaar	flex-iv ;
+TUAR=INNAR=NNGIT+vv:%>tuaannanngi	flex-iv_nngit ;
+TUAR=INNAR=NNGIT=GALUAR+vv:%>tuaannanngikkaluar	flex-iv ;
+TUAR=INNAR=NNGIT=GALUAR=LLAR+vv:%>tuaannanngikkaluallar	flex-iv ;
+TUAR=INNAR=NNGIT=GALUAR=NGAAR+vv:%>tuaannanngikkaluangaar	flex-iv ;
+TUAR=INNAR=NNGIT=GALUAR=NIKUU+vv:%>tuaannanngikkaluarnikuu	flex-iv_voq ;
+TUAR=INNAR=NNGIT=GALUAR=NIR+vv:%>tuaannanngikkaluarner	XIiX_fleksiver ;
